Massachusetts, session 194th, H487.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall be defined as such:
“Massachusetts entity”, any corporation, business, limited liability company, association,
partnership, venture, state agency, K-12 school, institute of higher learning, or other organization
operating within the commonwealth.
“Chinese state-owned company”, any corporation, business, association, partnership,
venture, limited liability company, or other entity or business association owned fully or in part
by, or affiliated with, the government of China.
of 2

Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, there shall be established a
special commission to study the financial relationship between Massachusetts entities and
Chinese state-owned companies. The commission shall identify Massachusetts-based assets held
by Chinese state-owned companies, ascertain the extent to which business operations conducted
by Chinese state-owned companies affect local industries, and assess the corresponding dangers
posed to the commonwealth’s economic wellbeing and sovereignty.
The commission shall include the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on
economic development and emerging technologies, who shall serve as co-chairs; the house and
senate chairs of the joint committee on export development; the speaker of the house of
representatives or a designee; the president of the senate or a designee; the minority leader of the
house of representatives or a designee; the minority leader of the senate or a designee; the chair
of the House Asian Caucus or a designee; the secretary of the commonwealth or a designee; the
secretary of housing and economic development or a designee; the secretary of labor and
workforce development or a designee; the treasurer of the commonwealth or a designee; the state
auditor or a designee; the president of the University of Massachusetts system or a designee; and
1 member appointed by each of the following organizations: Massachusetts Association of
Realtors; Massachusetts Technology Leadership Council; Greater Boston Chamber of
Commerce; Massachusetts Bankers Association; and the Massachusetts Biotechnology Council.
The commission shall file a report with its findings and recommendations to the clerks of
the house and senate no later than December 31, 2027.
of 2